District of Columbia statutes.
38-1205.12

Full faith and credit of the District of Columbia not pledged.

The full faith and credit of the District of Columbia is not pledged for the payment of any principal of or interest on any obligation maintained or entered into by the Antioch School of Law, directly or indirectly, in whole or in part. The District of Columbia is not responsible or liable for payment of any principal of or interest on any obligation entered into by the Antioch School of Law, directly or indirectly, in whole or part.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title V, § 512
as added Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 2(a), 33 DCR 7241

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1552.